Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1463.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1455, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 87, O.S.L. 2023 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1455), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1455. A. There is hereby re-created, to continue until
July 1, 2026 July 1, 2031, in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Sunset Law, the Polygraph Examiners Board.
B. 1. The persons serving on the Board on June 30, 1988, shall
continue to serve the full terms for which they were originally
appointed until their successors have been duly appointed and
approved with the advice and consent of the Senate. All future
Boards shall continue the staggered terms of office established for
the Polygraph Examiners Board prior to July 1, 1988.

2. Any actions taken by any state agency on behalf of the
Polygraph Examiners Board or in an attempt to enforce the provisions
of the Polygraph Examiners Act shall be subject to review by the
Board. Any such acts may be rescinded or modified as deemed
appropriate by the Board, provided that such action shall not affect
any accrued right, or penalty incurred, or proceeding begun between
July 1, 1988, and October 12, 1988.
3. All funds collected after June 30, 1988, equipment, files,
fixtures, furniture, and supplies of the Board which were
transferred to the Office of Management and Enterprise Services or
State Treasury pursuant to Section 3909 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma
Statutes shall be returned to the care and custody of the Board.
4. All orders, determinations, rules, regulations, permits,
certificates, licenses, contracts, rates, and privileges which have
been issued, made, granted, or allowed by the Board and are in
effect on June 30, 1988, shall continue in effect according to their
terms until further action is taken by the Board or as modified by
law.
C. The Board shall consist of five (5) members who shall be
citizens of the United States and residents of the state for at
least two (2) years prior to appointment, all of whom shall have
been engaged for a period of two (2) consecutive years as polygraph
examiners prior to appointment to the Board, and at the time of
appointment are active polygraph examiners. No two Board members
may be employed by the same person or agency. No more than two
members may be appointed from one congressional district. However,
when congressional districts are redrawn, each member appointed
prior to July 1 of the year in which such modification becomes
effective shall complete the current term of office and appointments
made after July 1 of the year in which such modification becomes
effective shall be based on the redrawn districts. No appointments
may be made after July 1 of the year in which such modification
becomes effective if such appointment would result in more than two
members serving from the same modified district. At least two
members must shall be qualified examiners of a governmental law
enforcement agency and at least two members must shall be qualified
polygraph examiners in the commercial field. The members shall be
appointed by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma, with the advice
and consent of the Senate, for terms of six (6) years. Any vacancy
ENR. S. B. NO. 1463 Page 2

in an unexpired term shall be filled by appointment of the Governor,
with the advice and consent of the Senate, for the unexpired term.
Except as authorized by the Polygraph Examiners Act, members of the
Board shall be paid no fee, expense reimbursement, wage, or other
compensation for their services.
D. The vote of a majority of the Board members is shall be
sufficient for passage of any business or proposal which comes
before the Board. The Board shall elect a chair, vice-chair vice
chair, and secretary from among its members.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1463 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1463 Page 4